Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.130

Application of RCW 39.04.120.

RCW 39.04.120 shall take effect in ninety days but shall not apply to any contract awarded pursuant to an invitation for bids issued on or before the date it takes effect, or to any persons or bonds in respect of any such contract.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 62 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 62: See note following RCW 39.04.120.